Utah statutes.
16-16-106.   Powers.

A limited cooperative association may sue and be sued in its own name and do all things necessary or convenient to carry on its activities.  An association may maintain an action against a member for harm caused to the association by the member's violation of a duty to the association or of the organic law or organic rules.



Enacted by Chapter 363, 2008 General Session

